Maryland, session 2026, SB0529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 22. SOUTHERN MARYLAND EARLY COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY
PROGRAM.
7–2201.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND EARLY
COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY PROGRAM.
7–2202.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 766
(A) THERE IS A SOUTHERN MARYLAND EARLY COLLEGE TEACHER
PATHWAY PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) CREATE A STRUCTURED, CREDIT–BEARING PATHWAY FOR HIGH
SCHOOL STUDENTS TO BEGIN PREPARATION TO TEACH PRIMARY AND SECONDARY
EDUCATION;
(2) EXPAND ACCESS TO AND ENSURE THE AFFORDABILITY OF
HIGHER EDUCATION FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS WHO ARE:
(I) HISTORICALLY UNDERREPRESENTED IN HIGHER
EDUCATION; AND
(II) FROM RURAL AREAS OF THE STATE;
(3) BUILD A STRONG AND DIVERSE TEACHER PIPELINE TO SERVE THE
STATE’S PUBLIC PRIMARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOLS; AND
(4) SERVE AS A MODEL TO BE REPLICATED FOR REGIONAL
IMPLEMENTATION STATEWIDE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND HIGHER
EDUCATION COMMISSION, SHALL ADMINISTER AND IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM ON
COMPLETION OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND’S DEVELOPMENT OF THE
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–124 OF THIS ARTICLE.
7–2203.
A PROGRAM STUDENT SHALL BE CONSIDERED A DUALLY ENROLLED STUDENT
FOR PURPOSES OF § 15–127 OF THIS ARTICLE AND MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PAY
ANY COST THAT IS RELATED TO ENROLLMENT OR PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM,
INCLUDING TUITION AND MANDATORY FEES.
7–2204.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–124.
– 3 –

Ch. 766 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–2201 OF THIS
ARTICLE MEANS THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND EARLY COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY
PROGRAM.
(3) “PROGRAM WORKGROUP” MEANS THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND
EARLY COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY PROGRAM WORKGROUP.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AND IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMMISSION, THE UNIVERSITY
SHALL DEVELOP THE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR A SOUTHERN MARYLAND EARLY
COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY PROGRAM AND THE A TEACHER PREPARATION
PATHWAY IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND TO:
(1) CREATE A STRUCTURED, CREDIT–BEARING PATHWAY FOR HIGH
SCHOOL STUDENTS TO BEGIN PREPARATION TO TEACH PRIMARY AND SECONDARY
EDUCATION;
(2) EXPAND ACCESS TO AND ENSURE THE AFFORDABILITY OF
HIGHER EDUCATION FOR ALL HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS, INCLUDING STUDENTS WHO
ARE:
(I) HISTORICALLY UNDERREPRESENTED IN HIGHER
EDUCATION; AND
(II) FROM RURAL AREAS OF THE STATE;
(3) BUILD A STRONG AND DIVERSE TEACHER PIPELINE TO SERVE THE
STATE’S PUBLIC PRIMARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOLS; AND
(4) SERVE AS A MODEL TO BE REPLICATED FOR REGIONAL
IMPLEMENTATION STATEWIDE.
(C) (1) THE UNIVERSITY SHALL CONVENE A SOUTHERN MARYLAND
EARLY COLLEGE TEACHER PATHWAY PROGRAM WORKGROUP TO DEVELOP THE
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PROGRAM AND THE TEACHER PREPARATION
PATHWAY IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND.
(2) THE PROGRAM WORKGROUP SHALL CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING
MEMBERS:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 766
(I) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
(II) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(III) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED
BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(IV) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(V) THE CHAIR OF THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION BOARD, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE;
(VI) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(VII) THE CHANCELLOR, OR THE CHANCELLOR’S DESIGNEE;
(VIII) THE SENIOR VICE CHANCELLOR FOR ACADEMIC AND
STUDENT AFFAIRS OF THE UNIVERSITY, OR THE SENIOR VICE CHANCELLOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(IX) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM
OF MARYLAND AT SOUTHERN MARYLAND, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(X) THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND,
COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(XI) THE PRESIDENT OF TOWSON UNIVERSITY, OR THE
PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(XII) THE PRESIDENT OF ST. MARY’S COLLEGE OF MARYLAND,
OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(XII) (XIII) THE PRESIDENT OF THE COLLEGE OF SOUTHERN
MARYLAND, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(XIII) (XIV) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF COMMUNITY COLLEGES, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
– 5 –

Ch. 766 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(XV) THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS, OR THE COUNTY
SUPERINTENDENTS’ DESIGNEES, OF THE FOLLOWING COUNTIES:
1. CALVERT COUNTY;
2. CHARLES COUNTY; AND
3. ST. MARY’S COUNTY; AND
(XV) (XVI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM EACH LOCAL UNION
REPRESENTING EDUCATORS IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND, DESIGNATED BY THE
UNIVERSITY REPRESENTATIVE, WHO IS A LICENSED SCHOOL–BASED EMPLOYEE
WITH EXPERIENCE IMPLEMENTING POSTSECONDARY READINESS OR EARLY
TEACHER PREPARATION PROGRAMS, FROM EACH OF THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES:
1. THE CALVERT EDUCATION ASSOCIATION,
DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE ASSOCIATION, OR THE PRESIDENT’S
DESIGNEE;
2. THE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION OF CHARLES
COUNTY, DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE ASSOCIATION, OR THE
PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE; AND
3. THE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION OF ST. MARY’S
COUNTY, DESIGNATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE ASSOCIATION, OR THE
PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE; AND
(XIV) (XVI) (XVII) ANY OTHER MEMBERS DESIGNATED BY THE
UNIVERSITY.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2029, THE UNIVERSITY SHALL REPORT
TO THE DEPARTMENT, THE COMMISSION, THE GOVERNOR, AND, IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SENATE EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT COMMITTEE AND THE
HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE ON:
(I) THE PROGRAM WORKGROUP’S RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
THE PROGRAM AND THE TEACHER PREPARATION PATHWAY IN SOUTHERN
MARYLAND, INCLUDING:
1. THE STRUCTURE OF THE TEACHER PREPARATION
PATHWAY;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 766
2. AN IMPLEMENTATION PLAN FOR THE TEACHER
PREPARATION PATHWAY; AND
3. ANY LEGISLATIVE OR REGULATORY CHANGES
NECESSARY FOR SUCCESSFUL IMPLEMENTATION OF THE TEACHER PREPARATION
PATHWAY; AND
(II) THE USE OF STATE FUNDS TO DEVELOP THE PROGRAM
WORKGROUP’S RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PROGRAM AND THE TEACHER
PREPARATION PATHWAY IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND.
(D) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 AND 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $250,000 $125,000
TO THE UNIVERSITY TO SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE PROGRAM
WORKGROUP’S RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PROGRAM AND THE TEACHER
PREPARATION PATHWAY IN SOUTHERN MARYLAND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
15–127.
(a) (1) In this section, “dually enrolled student” means a student who is dually
enrolled in:
(i) A secondary school in the State; and
(ii) An institution of higher education in the State.
(2) “Dually enrolled student” includes a student enrolled in a credit or
noncredit certificate or license program, course, or sequence of courses that leads to
certification or licensure at an institution of higher education in the State.
(b) A public institution of higher education may not charge tuition to a dually
enrolled student.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, for each dually enrolled student who
is enrolled in a public school in the county, the county board shall pay 75% of the cost of
tuition for a public institution of higher education in the State.
(d) (1) If there is an agreement before July 1, 2020, between a public school
and a public institution of higher education in which the public institution of higher
education charges less than 75% of the cost of tuition to a dually enrolled student, the
county board shall pay the cost of tuition under the existing agreement.
– 7 –

Ch. 766 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Every 2 years, a public school and a public institution of higher
education may evaluate and modify an agreement made under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 8 –